Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1010
Severability.

If any provision of the Uniform Premarital Agreement Act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the act are severable.

Laws 1994, LB 202, § 10.